Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-1729
Violations bureau; purpose; payment of penalties.

Any city or village may, by ordinance, establish a violations bureau for the collection of penalties for nonmoving traffic violations within such city or village. Such violations shall not be subject to prosecution in the courts except when payment of the penalty is not made within the time prescribed by ordinance. When payment is not made within such time, the violations may be prosecuted in the same manner as other ordinance violations.

Laws 1973, LB 226, § 33;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 108.
August 28, 2021